Utah statutes.
7-7-29.   Investment in service organizations, business development credit
corporations, and service corporations.
(1)  An association may invest:
(a)  in capital stock, obligations, or other securities of service
organizations, and of business development credit corporations incorporated in
this state, provided that the aggregate of those investments may not exceed
10% of its assets; or
(b)  in capital stock, obligations, or other securities of any service
corporation, provided that the aggregate of those investments may not exceed
10% of its assets.
(2)  The commissioner may, by regulation, allow investments in excess of those
permitted by this section, if he finds that such investments promote the
viability and stability of the associations of this state.
